Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.05
Release of information; procedure.

(1) Upon receipt of a request for information made under section 43-146.04, the department shall check the records of the adopted person to determine whether an unrevoked nonconsent form is on file from a biological parent pursuant to section 43-146.06.

(2) If no nonconsent form has been filed pursuant to section 43-146.06, the following information shall be released to the adopted person:

(a) The name and address of the court which issued the adoption decree;

(b) The name and address of the child placement agency, if any, involved in the adoption;

(c) The fact that an agency or the department may assist the adopted person in searching for relatives as provided in sections 43-146.10 to 43-146.14;

(d) A copy of the person's original birth certificate; and

(e) A copy of the person's medical history and any medical records on file.

(3) If an unrevoked nonconsent form has been filed pursuant to section 43-146.06, no information may be released to the adopted person except a copy of the person's medical history as provided in section 43-107 if requested. The medical history shall not include the names of the biological parents or relatives of the adopted person or any other identifying information.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 46;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 94.